Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1,110.01
Substance abuse therapy; department; duties; waiver of requirement by board; when.

The department shall provide substance abuse therapy required by section 28-416 prior to the first parole eligibility date of the committed person. Based on the recommendations, if any, regarding psychological treatment of the committed person pursuant to section 83-179, the department shall provide the person with adequate access or availability to mental health therapy prior to the first parole eligibility date of the committed person. If the board finds that the department did not provide adequate access or availability to the committed person prior to the first parole eligibility date, the board may waive the requirement of section 28-416 only if, as a condition of parole, the committed person agrees to attend and complete therapy which is recommended by the board.

Laws 1994, LB 677, § 17;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 83-1,135.01;

Laws 1997, LB 274, § 1.